Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0254.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Municipality" means a county, city, township, village, or metropolitan district. (b) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation which is the owner or occupant of any house or other building or any premises, lot, or parcel of land. (c) "Provider" means a community water supply that is publicly or privately owned and that provides retail water service in this state. (d) (c) "Sewage system" means a sewage disposal system, including sanitary sewers, combined sanitary and storm sewers, plants, works, instrumentalities, and properties used or useful in connection with the collection, treatment, or disposal, of sewage or industrial wastes. Sec. 4a. If a provider receives a request from a lessee under section 1f(1) of 1972 PA 348, MCL 554.601f, the provider shall approve the lessee's request. As used in this section, "lessee" means a tenant as that term is defined in section 1 of 1972 PA 348, MCL 554.601. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 253. of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.